Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 19 Liability of Owners of Land

Chapter inapplicable to industrial subdivision. —

Where child and a friend decided to play on a hill near their residence, but the hill was actually an abandoned pile of coal tailings in which subsurface fires smoldered, and the child was seriously burned when he broke through the surface of the slag heap, which was located in an industrial subdivision, not on recreational land, this chapter was not applicable. Holland v. Weyher/Livsey Constructors, Inc., 651 F. Supp. 409, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 391 (D. Wyo. 1987).

Common law classification of entrants abandoned. —

Wyoming has abandoned the common law classifications of trespasser, licensee and invitee in favor of an ordinary negligence standard of care for entrants upon the land of others. Clark v. Beckwith, 858 P.2d 293,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1993).

Reasonable care owed non-trespassing entrants. —

The rule of “reasonable care under the circumstances” will be applied to all situations other than those involving trespass. The foreseeability of the injury, rather than the status of the lawful entrant, should be the basis of liability. Clark v. Beckwith, 858 P.2d 293,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “The Status of Visitors in the National Parks Located in Wyoming — Federal Liability Under Current Applicable Wyoming Law,” II Land & Water L. Rev. 447 (1967).

For comment, “Landowner Liability Under the Wyoming Recreational Use Statute,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 649 (1980).

For case note, “Torts—Duties of Owners and Occupiers of Land: The Impact of the Wyoming Supreme Court's Decision to Abolish a Portion of the Common-Law Status Classifications. Clark v. Beckwith, 858 P.2d 293,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 299 (1994).

For article, “Recreational Injuries and Inherent Risks: Wyoming's Recreation Safety Act: An Update,” see XXXIII Land & Water L Rev. 249 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of swimming facility operator for injury to or death of trespassing child, 88 ALR3d 1197.

Liability of youth camp, to its agents or employees, or of scouting leader or organization, for injury to child participant in program, 88 ALR3d 1236.

Liability of swimming facility operator for injury or death inflicted by third person, 90 ALR3d 533.

Liability to spectator at baseball game who is hit by ball or injured as result of other hazards of game, 91 ALR3d 24.

Liability of owner or operator of boat livery for injury to patron, 94 ALR3d 876.

Liability for injuries in connection with ice or snow on nonresidential premises, 95 ALR3d 15.

Liability for injury or death from ski lift, ski tow or similar device, 95 ALR3d 203.

Liability of theater owner or operator for injury to or death of patron resulting from lighting conditions on premises, 19 ALR4th 1110.

Liability of owner or occupant of premises to police officer coming thereon in discharge of officer's duty, 30 ALR4th 81.

Liability of wharf owner or operator for personal injuries to invitees or licensees resulting from condition of premises or operation of equipment, 34 ALR4th 572.

Liability of owner or operator of pleasure boat for injury or death of guest passenger, 35 ALR4th 104.

Effect of statute limiting landowner's liability for personal injury to recreational user, 47 ALR4th 262.

Strict liability of landlord for injury or death of tenant or third person caused by defect in premises leased for residential use, 48 ALR4th 638.

Parking facility proprietor's liability for criminal attack on patron, 49 ALR4th 1257.

Tennis club's liability for tennis player's injuries, 52 ALR4th 1253.

Liability to one struck by golf ball, 53 ALR4th 282.

Tree or limb falls onto adjoining private property: personal injury and property damage liability, 54 ALR4th 530.

Ski resort's liability for skier's injuries resulting from condition of ski run or slope, 55 ALR4th 632.

Baseball player's right to recover from baseball-related personal injuries from nonplayer, 55 ALR4th 664.

Liability for injuries to, or death of, water-skiers, 34 ALR5th 77.

Apportionment of liability between landowners and assailants for injuries to crime victims, 54 ALR5th 379.

Products liability: swimming pools and accessories, 65 ALR5th 105.